Nebraska, session 109, LB1084.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1084 LB1084
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-919, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-919 (1)(a) A law enforcement officer may take a person into
emergency protective custody, cause him or her to be taken into emergency
protective custody, or continue his or her custody if he or she is
already in custody if the officer has probable cause to believe:
(i) Such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex
offender and that the harm described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1)
of section 83-174.01 is likely to occur before mental health board
proceedings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex
Offender Commitment Act may be initiated to obtain custody of the person;
or
(ii) For a person domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, that
such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
under tribal law and that harm comparable to that described in section
71-908 or subdivision (1) of section 83-174.01 or the equivalent under
tribal law is likely to occur before mental health proceedings under
tribal law may be initiated to obtain custody of the person.
(b) Such person shall be admitted to an appropriate and available
medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of this section,
each county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the
emergency protective custody of persons from such county in such
facilities.
(ii) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for
whom emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the
tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make arrangements for
payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from
-2-

LB1084 LB1084
2026 2026
such tribe in such facilities.
(d) A mental health professional who has probable cause to believe
that a person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
may cause such person to be taken into custody and shall have a limited
privilege to hold such person until a law enforcement officer or other
authorized person arrives to take custody of such person.
(2)(a) For purposes of this subsection, convicted sex offender means
a person with a prior conviction for an offense listed in section
29-4003.
(b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section who is not a convicted sex offender shall be admitted to an
appropriate and available medical facility, except that such person may
instead be admitted to a jail or other facility with an available mental
health bed under the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act
until an appropriate medical facility is available.
(c) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section who is not a convicted sex offender shall be admitted to a jail
or Department of Correctional Services facility unless a medical or
psychiatric emergency exists for which treatment at a medical facility is
required. The person in emergency protective custody shall remain at the
medical facility until the medical or psychiatric emergency has passed
and it is safe to transport such person, at which time the person shall
be transferred to an available jail or Department of Correctional
Services facility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section,
upon admission to a facility or jail of a person taken into emergency
protective custody by a law enforcement officer under this section, such
officer shall execute a written certificate prescribed and provided by
the Department of Health and Human Services. The certificate shall allege
the officer's belief that the person in custody is mentally ill and
dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and shall contain a summary of the
-3-

LB1084 LB1084
2026 2026
person's behavior supporting such allegations. A copy of such certificate
shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney.
(b) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, upon admission to a facility or jail, such officer
shall execute written documentation in a format provided by the tribe. At
a minimum, such documentation shall clearly identify the subject,
identify the relevant tribe, allege the officer's belief that the person
in custody is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
under tribal law, and contain a summary of the subject's behavior
supporting such allegations. A copy of such documentation shall be
immediately forwarded to the appropriate tribal prosecutor or tribal
official.
(4)(a) The administrator of the facility or jail shall have such
person evaluated by a mental health professional as soon as reasonably
possible but not later than thirty-six hours after admission. The mental
health professional shall not be the mental health professional who
causes such person to be taken into custody under this section and shall
not be a member or alternate member of the mental health board that will
preside over any hearing under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act
or the Sex Offender Commitment Act with respect to such person. Upon the
agreement of all parties, the evaluation may be conducted by
videoconferencing if the mental health professional thinks it appropriate
under the circumstances.
(b) A person shall be released from emergency protective custody
after completion of such evaluation unless the mental health professional
determines, in his or her clinical opinion, that such person is mentally
ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender. In the case of a subject
domiciled within Indian country who is taken into emergency protective
custody under tribal law, the mental health professional shall notify an
appropriate tribal prosecutor or official of such release.
-4-

LB1084 LB1084
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Section 71-1203, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-1203 For purposes of the Sex Offender Commitment Act:
(1) The definitions found in sections 71-904.02, 71-904.03, 71-905,
71-906, 71-907, 71-910, 71-911, 71-914.01, 71-914.02, 71-914.03, and
83-174.01 apply;
(2) Administrator means the administrator or other chief
administrative officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail,
or Department of Correctional Services facility or his or her designee;
(3) Outpatient treatment means treatment ordered by a mental health
board directing a subject to comply with specified outpatient treatment
requirements, including, but not limited to, (a) taking prescribed
medication, (b) reporting to a mental health professional or treatment
facility for treatment or for monitoring of the subject's condition, or
(c) participating in individual or group therapy or educational,
rehabilitation, residential, or vocational programs;
(4)(a) Subject means any person concerning whom (i) a certificate
has been filed under section 71-1204, (ii) a certificate has been filed
under section 71-919 and such person is held pursuant to subdivision (2)
(c) (2)(b) of section 71-919, or (iii) a petition has been filed under
the Sex Offender Commitment Act.
(b) Subject also includes a person who is a member of a tribe or
eligible for membership in a tribe, who is domiciled within Indian
country in Nebraska, and concerning whom sex offender involuntary
commitment or emergency protective custody proceedings have been
initiated under tribal law.
(c) Subject does not include any person under eighteen years of age
unless such person is an emancipated minor; and
(5) Treatment facility means a facility which provides services for
persons who are dangerous sex offenders.
Sec. 3. Original sections 71-919 and 71-1203, Revised Statutes
-5-

LB1084 LB1084
2026 2026
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-